test/src/morphology/V-uhwhtuma70_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - unõh(t)uma: # Verb (70) unõh(t)uma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     unõh(t)uma+V+Inf/mA: unõh(t)uma
     unõh(t)uma+V+Inf: unõh(t)udaq
     unõh(t)uma+V+ActPrtPrc: unõh(t)unuq
     unõh(t)uma+V+PssPrtPrc: unõh(t)ut
     unõh(t)uma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: unõh(t)u
     unõh(t)uma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: unõh(t)us
     unõh(t)uma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: unõh(t)u
     unõh(t)uma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: unõh(t)u
